Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1225
Reformulated gasoline; requirements for sale.

Reformulated gasoline which is sold after January 1, 1992, in ozone nonattainment areas of Nebraska as designated by the federal Environmental Protection Agency shall contain an oxygen content equal to or greater than three and one-tenth percent weight oxygen.

Laws 1990, LB 1124, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 134.